Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-270
Hearing examiner; duties.

In addition to the other duties provided in the Student Discipline Act, the hearing examiner shall remain impartial throughout all deliberations. The hearing examiner shall be available prior to any hearing held pursuant to the act to answer any questions the principal, the student, or the student's parent or guardian may have regarding the nature and conduct of the hearing.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 14;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 20;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,183;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 74.